Utah statutes.
53A-2-202.   Guardianship for residency purposes by responsible adult --
Procedure to obtain -- Termination.
(1)  For purposes of this part, "responsible adult" means a person 21 years of
age or older who is a resident of this state and is willing and able to
provide reasonably adequate food, clothing, shelter, and supervision for a
minor child.
(2)  A local board of education may adopt a policy permitting it to designate
a responsible adult residing in the school district as legal guardian of a
child whose custodial parent or legal guardian does not reside within the
state upon compliance with the following requirements:
(a)  submission to the school district of a signed and notarized affidavit by
the child's custodial parent or legal guardian stating that:
(i)  the child's presence in the district is not for the primary purpose of
attending the public schools;
(ii)  the child's physical, mental, moral, or emotional health would best be
served by a transfer of guardianship to the Utah resident;
(iii)  the affiant is aware that designation of a guardian under this section
is equivalent to a court-ordered guardianship under Section 75-5-206 and will
suspend or terminate any existing parental or guardianship rights in the same
manner as would occur under a court-ordered guardianship;
(iv)  the affiant consents and submits to any such suspension or termination
of parental or guardianship rights;
(v)  the affiant consents and submits to the jurisdiction of the state
district court in which the school district is located in any action relating
to the guardianship or custody of the child in question;
(vi)  the affiant designates a named responsible adult as agent, authorized to
accept service on behalf of the affiant of any process, notice, or demand
required or permitted to be served in connection with any action under
Subsection (2)(a)(v); and
(vii)  it is the affiant's intent that the child become a permanent resident
of the state and reside with and be under the supervision of the named
responsible adult;
(b)  submission to the school district of a signed and notarized affidavit by
the responsible adult stating that:
(i)  the affiant is a resident of the school district and desires to become
the guardian of the child;
(ii)  the affiant consents and submits to the jurisdiction of the state
district court in which the school district is located in any action relating
to the guardianship or custody of the child in question;
(iii)  the affiant will accept the responsibilities of guardianship for the
duration, including the responsibility to provide adequate supervision,
discipline, food, shelter, educational and emotional support, and medical care
for the child if designated as the child's guardian; and
(iv)  the affiant accepts the designation as agent under Subsection
(2)(a)(vi);
(c)  submission to the school district of a signed and notarized affidavit by
the child stating that:
(i)  the child desires to become a permanent resident of Utah and reside with
and be responsible to the named responsible adult; and
(ii)  the child will abide by all applicable rules of any public school which
the child may attend after guardianship is awarded; and
(d)  if the child's custodial parent or legal guardian cannot be found in
order to execute the statement required under Subsection (2) (a), the
responsible adult must submit an affidavit to that effect to the district.
The district shall also submit a copy of the statement to the Criminal
Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public
Safety, established in Section 53-10-103.
(3)  The district may require the responsible adult, in addition to the
documents set forth in Subsection (2), to also submit any other documents
which are relevant to the appointment of a guardian of a minor or which the
district reasonably believes to be necessary in connection with a given
application to substantiate any claim or assertion made in connection with the
application for guardianship.
(4)  Upon receipt of the information and documentation required under
Subsections (2) and (3), and a determination by the board that the information
is accurate, that the requirements of this section have been met, and that the
interests of the child would best be served by granting the requested
guardianship, the school  board or its authorized representative may designate
the applicant as guardian of the child by issuing a designation of
guardianship letter to the applicant.
(5) (a)  If a local school board has adopted a policy permitting the board to
designate a guardian under this section, a denial of an application for
appointment of a guardian may be appealed to the district court in which the
school district is located.
(b)  The court shall uphold the decision of the board unless it finds, by
clear and convincing evidence, that the board's decision was arbitrary and
capricious.
(c)  An applicant may, rather than appealing the board's decision under
Subsection (5)(b), file an original Petition for Appointment of Guardian with
the district  court, which action shall proceed as if no decision had been
made by the school board.
(6)  A responsible adult obtaining guardianship under this section has the
same rights, authority, and responsibilities as a guardian appointed under
Section 75-5-201.
(7) (a)  The school district shall deliver the original documents filed with
the school district, together with a copy of the designation of guardianship
issued by the district, in person or by any form of mail requiring a signed
receipt, to the clerk of the state district court in which the school district
is located.
(b)  The court may not charge the school district a fee for filing
guardianship papers under this section.
(8) (a)  The authority and responsibility of a custodial parent or legal
guardian submitting  an affidavit under this section may be restored by the
district, and the guardianship obtained under this section terminated by the
district:
(i)  upon submission to the school district in which the guardianship was
obtained of a signed and notarized statement by the person who consented to
guardianship under Subsection (2) (a)  requesting termination of the
guardianship; or
(ii)  by the person accepting guardianship under Subsection (2) (b) requesting
the termination of the guardianship.
(b)  If the school district determines that it would not be in the best
interests of the child to terminate the guardianship, the district may refer
the request for termination to the state district court in which the documents
were filed under Subsection (5) for further action consistent with the
interests of the child.
(9)  The school district shall retain copies of all documents required by this
section  until the child in question has reached the age of 18 unless directed
to surrender the documents by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(10) (a)  Intentional submission to a school district of fraudulent or
misleading information under this part is punishable under Section 76-8-504.
(b)  A school district which has reason to believe that a party has
intentionally submitted false or misleading information under this part may,
after notice and opportunity for the party to respond to the allegation:
(i)  void any guardianship, authorization, or action which was based upon the
false or misleading information; and
(ii)  recover, from the party submitting the information, the full cost of any
benefits received by the child on the basis of the false or misleading
information, including tuition, fees, and other unpaid school charges,
together with any related costs of recovery.
(c)  A student whose guardianship or enrollment has been terminated under this
section may, upon payment of all applicable tuition and fees, continue in
enrollment until the end of the school year unless excluded from attendance
for cause.
